District of Columbia statutes.
3-1415

Repealed

Conflicting relationships or interests.

Repealed.

Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-152, § 16, 41 DCR 4636
June 6, 1998, D.C. Law 12-115, § 2, 45 DCR 1957
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2082(j), 57 DCR 181
1981 Ed., § 2-4015.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Sports Commission Conflict of Interest Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-141, June 13, 1996, law notification 43 DCR 3369).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Sports Commission Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-226, March 15, 1996, 43 DCR 1534).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 2082(j) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 2082(j) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
Construction of Law 10-152: See note to § 3-1401.